Mississippi, session 2026, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "2026 Youth Mental Health Access For All Act". (2)  The Legislature finds and declares the following: (a)  The State of Mississippi is currently experiencing a mental health crisis among its youth, which requires immediate, scalable and innovative intervention; (b)  Providing students with 24/7, 365-day access to professional teletherapy and crisis services is a necessary, complimentary resource to existing school counselors, ensuring support is available during after-school hours, weekends and holidays; (c)  To ensure student safety and fiscal responsibility, the state must contract with established, high-capacity vendors capable of immediate and equitable state-wide deployment. (3)  (a)  There is established the Student 24/7 Teletherapy Pilot Project to be administered by the State Department of Education.  The pilot project is intended to provide coverage for approximately 216,830 youth across the state. (b)  The department shall award grants to local school districts, charter schools and nonpublic schools to provide teletherapy services to students in Grades 6 through 12. The department shall establish the terms and conditions of each grant awarded under the project and the criteria for eligibility under the project.  The department may contract with vendors capable of providing the services required for the pilot project to the local school districts, charter schools and nonpublic schools. (c)  Local school districts, charter schools and nonpublic schools shall use the grant funds awarded to implement the pilot project, in coordination with vendors chosen by the department to provide 24/7 telehealth services as described in subsection (4) of this section. (4)  To ensure the stability and safety of the services provided under this pilot project, any participating vendor must meet the following minimum qualifications: (a)  The vendor must have at least five (5) years of experience in the telehealth or teletherapy industry. (b)  The vendor must currently serve no fewer than two million five hundred thousand (2,500,000) current students in a K-12 or post-secondary educational setting. (c)  The vendor must maintain a community of one hundred percent (100%) licensed clinicians who are vetted for experience and passion for supporting student mental health. (5)  The vendor's platform and service model must provide the following: (a)  Immediate availability through same-day teletherapy appointments; (b)  Crisis support through direct crisis connection with licensed therapists trained in trauma and crisis, available on a twenty-four-hour basis, seven (7) days a week and three hundred sixty-five (365) days a year, with follow-up provided no more than thirty (30) days following the initial connection; (c)  Services that are one hundred percent (100%) free to students, with no insurance requirements, no referrals, and no financial barriers to entry; (d)  A technology-driven platform that allows students to choose their own therapist based on preference, including preference of specialty, background or identity, via video, phone, chat or asynchronous messaging; (e)  Services that act as an extension of the school's team, complementing existing mental health offerings and aligning with local district protocols and state mandatory reporting laws. (f)  The vendor must provide districts with real-time data and usage analytics while maintaining strict compliance with federal laws, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act. (6)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Student 24/7 Teletherapy Pilot Project Fund.  The special fund shall consist of monies appropriated by the Legislature for funding the program, and any other monies that are made available for the purpose of the program.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of the program.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (b)  The department may expend not more than ten percent (10%) of the funds available for the pilot project on the administration of the project, including, but not limited to, on the development of the grant application process, oversight of vendor compliance, and data collection. (7)  The State Department of Education shall submit a report to the Legislature by October 1, 2027, detailing the participation rates, usage data and student outcomes observed during the first year of the pilot project. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.